California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Any person who knowingly and fraudulently represents himself or herself, through verbal or written notice, to be the owner or trainer of any canine licensed as, to be qualified as, or identified as, a guide, signal, or service dog, as defined in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 365.5 and paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 54.1 of the Civil Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) As used in this section, “owner” means any person who owns a guide, signal, or service dog, or who is authorized by the owner to use the guide, signal, or service dog.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1257, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

367f.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), it shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly acquire, receive, sell, promote the transfer of, or otherwise transfer any human organ, for purposes of transplantation, for valuable consideration.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), it shall be unlawful to remove or transplant any human organ with the knowledge that the organ has been acquired or will be transferred or sold for valuable consideration in violation of subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Human organ” includes, but is not limited to, a human
 kidney, liver, heart, lung, pancreas, or any other human organ or nonrenewable or nonregenerative tissue except plasma and sperm.

(2) “Valuable consideration” means financial gain or advantage, but does not include the reasonable costs associated with the removal, storage, transportation, and transplantation of a human organ, or reimbursement for those services, or the expenses of travel, housing, and lost wages incurred by the donor of a human organ in connection with the donation of the organ.

(d) No act respecting the nonsale donation of organs or other nonsale conduct pursuant to or in the furtherance of the purposes of the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code, including acts
 pursuant to anatomical gifts offered under Section 12811.3 of the Vehicle Code, shall be made unlawful by this section.

(e) This section shall not apply to the person from whom the organ is removed, nor to the person who receives the transplant, or those persons’ next-of-kin who assisted in obtaining the organ for purposes of transplantations.

(f) A licensed physician and surgeon who transplants a human organ in violation of subdivision (b) shall not be criminally liable under that subdivision if the act is performed under emergency and life-threatening conditions.

(g) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) shall be punished by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by imprisonment
 pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for three, four, or five years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 211, Sec. 2.   (AB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

367g.

(a) It shall be unlawful for anyone to knowingly use sperm, ova, or embryos in assisted reproduction technology, for any purpose other than that indicated by the sperm, ova, or embryo provider’s signature on a written consent form.

(b) It shall be unlawful for anyone to knowingly implant sperm, ova, or embryos, through the use of assisted reproduction technology, into a recipient who is not the sperm, ova, or embryo provider, without the signed written consent of the sperm, ova, or embryo provider and recipient.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of
 Section 1170 for three, four, or five years, by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Written consent, for the purposes of this section, shall not be required of men who donate sperm to a licensed tissue bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 335.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Crimes Against Elders, Dependent Adults, and Persons with Disabilities  [368. - 368.7.]

368.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that elders, adults whose physical or mental disabilities or other limitations restrict their ability to carry out normal activities or to protect their rights, and adults admitted as inpatients to a 24-hour health facility deserve special consideration and protection.

(b) (1) A person who knows or reasonably should know that a person is an elder or dependent adult and who, under circumstances or conditions likely to produce great bodily harm or death, willfully causes or permits any elder or dependent adult to suffer, or inflicts thereon unjustifiable physical pain or mental suffering, or having the care or custody of any elder or
 dependent adult, willfully causes or permits the person or health of the elder or dependent adult to be injured, or willfully causes or permits the elder or dependent adult to be placed in a situation in which their person or health is endangered, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years.

(2) If, in the commission of an offense described in paragraph (1), the victim suffers great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7, the defendant shall receive an additional term in the state prison as follows:

(A) Three years if the victim is under 70 years of age.

(B) Five years if the victim is 70 years of age or older.

(3) If, in the commission of an offense described in paragraph (1), the defendant proximately causes the death of the victim, the defendant shall receive an additional term in the state prison as follows:

(A) Five years if the victim is under 70 years of age.

(B) Seven years if the victim is 70 years of age or older.

(c) A person who knows or reasonably should know that a person is an elder or dependent adult and who, under circumstances or conditions other than those likely to produce great bodily harm or death, willfully causes or permits any elder
 or dependent adult to suffer, or inflicts thereon unjustifiable physical pain or mental suffering, or having the care or custody of any elder or dependent adult, willfully causes or permits the person or health of the elder or dependent adult to be injured or willfully causes or permits the elder or dependent adult to be placed in a situation in which their person or health may be endangered, is guilty of a misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation of this subdivision is punishable by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) A person who is not a caretaker who violates any provision of law proscribing theft, embezzlement, forgery, or fraud, or who violates Section 530.5 proscribing identity theft, with respect to the
 property or personal identifying information of an elder or a dependent adult, and who knows or reasonably should know that the victim is an elder or a dependent adult, is punishable as follows:

(1) By a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years, or by both that fine and imprisonment, when the moneys, labor, goods, services, or real or personal property taken or obtained is of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(2) By a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail
 not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, when the moneys, labor, goods, services, or real or personal property taken or obtained is of a value not exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(e) A caretaker of an elder or a dependent adult who violates any provision of law proscribing theft, embezzlement, forgery, or fraud, or who violates Section 530.5 proscribing identity theft, with respect to the property or personal identifying information of that elder or dependent adult, is punishable as follows:

(1) By a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant
 to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years, or by both that fine and imprisonment, when the moneys, labor, goods, services, or real or personal property taken or obtained is of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(2) By a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, when the moneys, labor, goods, services, or real or personal property taken or obtained is of a value not exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(f) A person who commits the false imprisonment of an elder or a dependent adult by the use of violence, menace, fraud, or deceit is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(g) As used in this section, “elder” means a person who is 65 years of age or older.

(h) As used in this section, “dependent adult” means a person, regardless of whether the person lives independently, who is between the ages of 18 and 64, who has physical or mental limitations which restrict their ability to carry out normal activities or to protect their rights, including, but not limited to, persons who have physical or developmental disabilities or whose physical or mental abilities have diminished because of age. “Dependent adult” includes a person between the ages of 18 and 64 who is admitted as an inpatient to a 24-hour health facility, as defined in Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) As used in this section, “caretaker” means a person who has the care, custody, or control of, or who stands in a position of trust with, an elder or a dependent adult.

(j) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under both this section and Section 187 or 12022.7 or any other provision of law. However, a person shall not receive an additional term of imprisonment under both paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) for a single offense, nor shall a person receive an additional term of imprisonment under both Section 12022.7 and paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) for a single offense.

(k) In any case in which a person is convicted of violating these provisions, the court may require them to receive appropriate counseling as a condition of probation. A
 defendant ordered to be placed in a counseling program shall be responsible for paying the expense of participation in the counseling program as determined by the court. The court shall take into consideration the ability of the defendant to pay, and no defendant shall be denied probation because of the inability to pay.

(l) Upon conviction for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f), the sentencing court shall also consider issuing an order restraining the defendant from any contact with the victim, which may be valid for up to 10 years, as determined by the court. It is the intent of the Legislature that the length of any restraining order be based upon the seriousness of the facts before the court, the probability of future violations, the safety of the victim and their immediate family, and the information provided to the
 court pursuant to Section 273.75. This protective order may be issued by the court whether the defendant is sentenced to state prison or county jail, or if imposition of sentence is suspended and the defendant is placed on probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 538, Sec. 5.   (AB 2907)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

368.5.

(a) Local law enforcement agencies and state law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction have concurrent jurisdiction to investigate elder and dependent adult abuse and all other crimes against elder victims and victims with disabilities.

(b) Adult protective services agencies and local long-term care ombudsman programs also have jurisdiction within their statutory authority to investigate elder and dependent adult abuse and criminal neglect, and may assist local law enforcement agencies in criminal investigations at the law enforcement agencies’ request, if consistent with federal law; however, law enforcement agencies retain exclusive responsibility for criminal investigations, notwithstanding any law to the contrary.

(c) (1) Every local law enforcement agency shall, when the agency next undertakes the policy revision process, revise or include in the portion of its policy manual relating to elder and dependent adult abuse, if that policy manual exists, the following information:

(A) The elements of the offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 368.

(B) The elements of the offense specified in subdivision (f) of Section 368.

(C) The requirement, pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), that law enforcement agencies have the responsibility for criminal investigations of elder and dependent adult abuse and criminal neglect; however, adult protective services agencies and long-term care ombudsman programs have authority to investigate incidents of
 elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect and may, if requested and consistent with federal law, assist law enforcement agencies with criminal investigations.

(D) As a guideline to investigators and first responders, the definition of elder and dependent adult abuse, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(2) As used in this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) (i) “Elder and dependent adult abuse” means any of the following:

(I) Physical abuse, neglect, abandonment, isolation, abduction, or other treatment with resulting physical harm or pain or mental suffering.

(II) The deprivation by a care custodian of goods or services
 that are necessary to avoid physical harm or mental suffering.

(III) Financial abuse.

(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, the terms “abandonment,” “abduction,” “financial abuse,” “goods and services necessary to avoid physical harm or mental suffering,” “isolation,” “mental suffering,” “neglect,” and “physical abuse” have the same meanings as in Article 2 (commencing with Section 15610) of Chapter 11 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) “Local law enforcement agency” means every municipal police department and county sheriffs’ department.

(C) “Policy manual” means any general orders, patrol manual, duty manual, or other written document or collection of documents that provides field or investigative personnel with
 policies, procedures, or guidelines for responding to or investigating crimes, complaints, or incidents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 1123)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

368.6.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Senior and Disability Justice Act.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agency protocol” means a procedure adopted by a local law enforcement agency consistent with the agency’s organizational structure, and stated in a policy adopted pursuant to this section, to effectively and accountably carry out a particular agency responsibility.

(2) “Caretaker” has the same meaning as defined in Section 368 and includes caretakers whether or not they are paid.

(3) “Dependent adult” has the same meaning as defined in Section 368.

(4) “Dependent person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 288.

(5) “Disability” includes mental disability and physical disability as defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, regardless of whether those disabilities are temporary, permanent, congenital, or acquired by heredity, accident, injury, illness, or advanced age.

(6) “Domestic violence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 13700 and includes a violation of Section 273.5.

(7) “Elder” has the same meaning as defined in Section 368.

(8) “Elder and dependent adult abuse” means a violation of Section 368 and includes physical abuse, neglect, financial abuse,
 abandonment, isolation, abduction, or other treatment with resulting physical harm, pain, or mental suffering, or the deprivation by a care custodian of goods or services that are necessary to avoid physical harm or mental suffering.

(9) “Hate crime” has the same meaning as set forth in Sections 422.55 and 422.56.

(10) “Human trafficking” means a violation of Section 236.1.

(11) “Local law enforcement agency” means every municipal police department and county sheriffs’ department.

(12) “Mandated reporting requirements” means any of the following:

(A) The requirements of Article 2.5
 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4.

(B) The requirements of Sections 15630 and 15630.1 and subdivision (d) of Section 15640 of the Welfare and Institutions Code concerning reporting of elder and dependent adult abuse.

(C) The prohibitions on inhibiting or impeding reporting pursuant to the requirements in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(13) “Senior and disability victimization” means any of the following:

(A) Elder and dependent adult abuse.

(B) Unlawful interference with a mandated report.

(C) Homicide of an elder,
 dependent adult, or other adult or child with a disability.

(D) Sex crimes against an elder, dependent adult, or other adult or child with a disability.

(E) Child abuse of children with disabilities.

(F) Violation of relevant protective orders.

(G) Hate crimes against persons with actual or perceived disabilities, including, but not limited to, disabilities caused by advanced age, or those associated with them.

(H) Domestic violence against an elder, dependent adult, or other adult or child with a disability, including any disability caused by advanced age.

(14) “Relevant protective order” means an order by a California or out-of-state court, including, but not limited to, a tribal, federal, United States territorial, or United States military court, protecting an elder, dependent adult, dependent person, or other adult or child with a disability.

(15) “Responsible agency” means a local, state, or federal agency with responsibilities concerning senior and disability victimization. This includes, but is not limited to, law enforcement agencies, adult protective services agencies, child protective services agencies, the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman and its designated local agencies, fire and emergency medical services, regional centers pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act, elder and disability service agencies, sexual assault and
 domestic violence agencies, elder and dependent adult death review teams, local government human relations commissions, coroners, probate court investigators, public administrators, public guardians, public conservators, district attorney’s offices, city attorney’s offices or other prosecutors with jurisdiction, the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse, state licensing agencies, the United States Attorney’s offices, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(16) “Sex crime” means either of the following:

(A) An offense requiring registration pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act.

(B) A violation of Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code.

(17) “State protection and advocacy agency” means the agency designated pursuant to Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(18) “Unlawful interference in a mandated report” includes, but is not limited to, inhibiting or impeding reporting in violation of the mandated reporting requirements or a violation of Section 136.1 that concerns the mandated reporting requirements.

(c) Each local law enforcement agency may adopt a policy regarding senior and disability victimization. A municipal police department or county sheriffs’ department that adopts or revises a policy regarding elder and dependent adult abuse or senior and
 disability victimization on or after April 13, 2021, shall
 include, but not be limited to, all of the following items:

(1) Information on the wide prevalence of elder and dependent adult abuse, sexual assault, other sex crimes, hate crimes, domestic violence, human trafficking, and homicide against adults and children with disabilities, including disabilities caused by advanced age, and including those crimes often committed by caretakers.

(2) A statement of the agency’s commitment to providing equal protection and demonstrating respect for all persons regardless of age or disabilities, and to conscientiously enforcing all criminal laws protecting elders, and adults and children with disabilities, regardless of whether these crimes also carry civil penalties.

(3) The definitions and elements of the offenses specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 288 and in subdivisions (c) and (f) of Section 368, noting that they protect many persons with disabilities regardless of the fact they live independently.

(4) (A) The fact that elder and dependent adult abuse, sex crimes, child abuse, domestic violence, and any other criminal act, when committed in whole or in part because of the victim’s actual or perceived disability, including disability caused by advanced age, is also a hate crime.

(B) In recognizing suspected disability-bias hate crimes, the policy shall instruct officers to consider whether there is any indication that the perpetrator committed the criminal act because of bias, including, but not
 limited to, the bias motivations described in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 422.87.

(5) An agency protocol and schedule for training officers with both of the following:

(A) The training materials made available by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Sections 13515, 13515.25, 13515.27, 13515.28, 13515.29, 13515.295, 13515.30, 13515.35, and 13519.2. In the case of the training materials identified in each of these sections, the agency protocol shall require the training for, at a minimum, the category of officers for whom that section states that the training is intended or required or, if the section does not state for whom the training material is required or intended, those officers identified pursuant
 to paragraph (16).

(B) The agency’s policy pursuant to this section.

(6) A requirement that when an officer intends to interview a victim or witness to an alleged crime and the victim or witness reports or demonstrates deafness or hearing loss, the officer first secure the services of an interpreter as defined in Section 754 of the Evidence Code. The agency shall have a protocol for securing the services of the interpreter to ensure accurate interpretation.

(7) An agency protocol for providing appropriate training concerning the agency’s policy to dispatchers, community services officers, front desk personnel, and other civilian personnel who interact with the public.

(8) (A) The fact that the agency requires officers to investigate every report of senior and disability victimization, and does not dismiss any reports as merely civil matters or for any other reason without an investigation.

(B) An appendix to the policy describing the requirements for these investigations, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) An agency protocol or protocols for cooperating and collaborating whenever possible with the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse, other state law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction, adult and child protective services, local long-term care ombudsman programs, and, when appropriate, other responsible agencies.

(ii) Appropriate techniques for interviewing potential victims and witnesses with cognitive or communication disabilities, including, but not limited to, avoiding repeated interviews when possible.

(iii) The elements of the investigation, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(I) Checking prior reports received by adult or child protective services agencies, local long-term care ombudsman programs, except as provided in Section 9725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and any other responsible agencies.

(II) Interviewing each alleged victim, each witness, and each suspect who is available.

(III) Viewing all body-worn camera videos
 and all other films.

(IV) Listening to all calls from mandated reports or other callers.

(V) Making reasonable efforts to determine whether any person committed unlawful interference in a mandated report.

(iv) An agency protocol for transmitting the crime report to the appropriate prosecution office if the law enforcement agency recommends prosecution.

(v) If the agency deems it appropriate, the Investigation Response section and Addendum B of the San Diego County Elder and Dependent Adult Abuse Blueprint or the Elder Abuse Guide for Law Enforcement of the National Center on Elder Abuse at the University of Southern California.

(9) (A) A statement that it is the agency’s policy to make arrests or to seek arrest warrants, in accordance with Section 836, and, in the case of domestic violence, as allowed by Section 13701. The policy shall also state the agency protocol for seeking those arrest warrants.

(B) The agency protocol for arrests for senior and disability victimization other than domestic violence, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following requirements:

(i) In the case of a senior and disability victimization committed in an officer’s presence, including, but not limited to, a violation of a relevant protective order, the officer shall make a warrantless arrest based on probable cause when necessary or
 advisable to protect the safety of the victim or others.

(ii) In the case of a felony not committed in an officer’s presence, the officer shall make a warrantless arrest based on probable cause when necessary or advisable to protect the safety of the victim or others.

(iii) In the case of a misdemeanor not committed in the officer’s presence, including, but not limited to, misdemeanor unlawful interference with a mandated report or a misdemeanor violation of a relevant protective order, or when necessary or advisable to protect the safety of the victim or others, the agency shall seek an arrest warrant based on probable cause.

(iv) The policy shall state the agency protocol for seeking arrest warrants based on
 probable cause for crimes for which no arrest has been made.

(10) The fact that senior and disability victimization crimes are also domestic violence subject to the mandatory arrest requirements of Section 836 if they meet the elements described in Section 273.5, including, but not limited to, a violation by a caretaker or other person who is or was a cohabitant of the victim, regardless of whether the cohabitant is or was a relative of, or in an intimate personal relationship with, the victim.

(11) (A) The fact that many victims of sexual assault and other sex crimes delay disclosing the crimes for reasons including, but not limited to, shame, embarrassment, self-doubt, fear of being disbelieved, and fear of retaliation by the perpetrator or others.

(B) An instruction pursuant to Sections 264.2 and 679.04 to notify potential victims of sex crimes that they have a right to have a support person of their choice present at all times.

(12) The agency’s cross-reporting requirements, including, but not limited to, those pursuant to Section 15640 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and an agency protocol for carrying out these cross-reporting requirements.

(13) Mandated reporting requirements, including, but not limited to, officers’ mandated reporting responsibilities and an agency protocol for carrying out the officers’ mandated reporting responsibilities.

(14) The fact that victims and witnesses with
 disabilities, including cognitive and communication disabilities, can be highly credible witnesses when interviewed appropriately by trained officers or other trained persons.

(15) A procedure for first-responding officers to follow when interviewing persons with cognitive and communication disabilities until officers, or staff of other responsible agencies, with more advanced training, are available. The procedure shall include an instruction to avoid repeated interviews whenever possible.

(16) The unit or office, or multiple units or offices of the agency, or the title or titles of an officer or officers, tasked with the following responsibilities:

(A) Receiving advanced officer training on senior and disability victimization,
 available from the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, the United States Department of Justice, the Disability and Abuse Project of the Spectrum Institute, or other sources.

(B) Acting as a liaison to other responsible agencies to increase cooperation and collaboration among them while retaining the law enforcement agency’s exclusive responsibility for criminal investigations.

(C) Reaching out to the senior and disability communities and to the public to encourage prevention and reporting of senior and disability victimization.

(17) An agency protocol for seeking emergency protective orders by phone from a court at any time of the day or night pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 6250 of the
 Family Code, including the court system telephone number for an officer to call, and a requirement that an officer utilize the agency protocol whenever necessary or advisable to protect a victim’s safety.

(18) A requirement that all officers treat an unexplained or suspicious death of an elder, dependent adult, or other adult or child with a disability as a potential homicide until a complete investigation, including an autopsy, is completed, and not to assume that the death of an elder or person with a disability is natural simply because of the age or disability of the deceased.

(19) A requirement that, whenever an officer verifies that a relevant protective order has been issued, the officer shall make reasonable efforts to determine if the order prohibits the possession of
 firearms or requires the relinquishment of firearms, and if the order does so, a requirement that the officer shall make reasonable efforts to do each of the following:

(A) Inquire whether the restrained person possesses firearms. The officer may make this effort by asking the restrained person and the protected person.

(B) Query through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System to determine if any firearms are registered to the restrained person.

(C) Receive or seize prohibited firearms located in plain view or pursuant to a consensual or other lawful search, in compliance with Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2 of Part 6.

(20) Civil remedies and resources available to victims, including, but not limited to, the program administered by the California Victim Compensation Board.

(21) The complete contents of any model policy on senior and disability victimization that the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training may develop based on this section, regardless of whether that model policy includes items in addition to those listed in this section.

(22) Use of the full term “elder and dependent adult abuse” in every reference to that crime, with no shorthand terms, including, but not limited to, “elder abuse” or “adult abuse.”

(23) A detailed checklist of first-responding officers’ responsibilities, including, but not limited
 to, all of the following:

(A) Taking responsibility for the safety and well-being of the potential victims and witnesses and treating all potential victims, witnesses, and suspects with dignity and respect.

(B) Complying with the provisions of the agency’s policy requirements for arrests and mandatory seeking of arrest warrants pursuant to paragraph (9) and the requirements for seeking emergency protective orders pursuant to paragraph (17).

(C) Following the policy’s guidelines for interviewing persons with cognitive or communication disabilities pursuant to paragraph (15).

(D) Recognizing that some elders and adults and children with cognitive or
 communication disabilities may have difficulty narrating events, appear to be poor historians, or lack short-term memory, which adds to their vulnerability and therefore requires officers to make special efforts to provide them with equal protection.

(E) Documenting the scene.

(F) Obtaining a signed medical release from potential victims.

(G) Interviewing caretakers separately, recognizing that in some cases, the caretaker is the perpetrator.

(H) Recognizing that victim cooperation is sometimes unnecessary for prosecution, and that in some cases allowing victims the option of preventing prosecution creates an opportunity for the perpetrators to obstruct justice
 by pressuring or threatening the victims. Each dispatch call or case should be investigated on its own evidential merits.

(I) Taking other actions necessary to comply with the provisions of the law enforcement agency’s policy pursuant to this section.

(24) The relevant content of any memoranda of understanding or similar agreements or procedures for cooperating with other responsible agencies, consistent with Section 368.5.

(25) A statement of the agency chief executive’s responsibilities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Taking leadership within the agency and in the community, including by speaking out publicly in major cases of senior and disability
 victimization, to assure the community of the agency’s support for the victims and their families and for others in the community who are terrorized and traumatized by the crimes, and to encourage victims and witnesses to the crimes or similar past or future crimes to report those crimes to help bring the perpetrators to justice and prevent further crimes.

(B) Carrying out specific responsibilities pursuant to this subdivision, including, but not limited to, developing and including agency protocols in this policy.

(C) Ensuring that all officers and staff carry out their responsibilities under the policy.

(26) An agency protocol for transmitting and periodically retransmitting the policy and any related orders to all
 officers, including a simple and immediate way for officers to access the policy in the field when needed.

(27) (A) A requirement that all officers be familiar with the policy and carry out the policy at all times except in the case of unusual compelling circumstances as determined by the agency’s chief executive or by another supervisory or command-level officer designated by the chief executive.

(B) A responsible officer who makes a determination allowing a deviation from the policy shall produce a report to the agency’s chief executive stating the unusual compelling circumstances. The policy shall include an agency protocol for providing copies of those reports to the alleged victims and reporting parties. The chief executive shall retain the report for a
 minimum of five years and shall make it available to the state protection and advocacy agency upon request.

(28) For each agency protocol, either a specific title-by-title list of officers’ responsibilities, or a specific office or unit in the law enforcement agency responsible for implementing the protocol.

(d) If a law enforcement agency adopts or revises
 a policy regarding senior and disability victimization on or after April 13, 2021, the chief executive shall make it available to the state protection and advocacy agency upon request.

(e) A law enforcement agency that adopts, revises, or has adopted or revised a policy regarding elder and dependent adult abuse in compliance with the requirements of Section 368.5 on or after April 13, 2021, shall also comply with the requirements of subdivision (c) and (d) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.   (AB 751)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

368.7.

The Department of Justice shall develop and distribute an informational notice that warns the public about elder and dependent adult fraud and directs them to information and resources necessary to determine whether they are victims of fraud. The notice shall provide information regarding how and where to file complaints. The notice shall also be made available on the Internet Web site of the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   (AB 2721)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10. OF CRIMES AGAINST THE PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY [369a. - 402c.]

369a.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares the following:

(1) Rail transit traffic safety programs are necessary to educate the public about the potential for harm and injury arising from an individual’s disregard for, and violation of, rail-related traffic safety laws, and to increase the consequences for those persons violating rail-related traffic safety laws.

(2) Currently, there does not exist a unified statewide system to deal with the ever increasing problem of rail-related traffic safety violators, and to provide a method of educating the public.

(b) In each county with a population greater than 500,000 in which a transportation commission or authority has been established and it owns or operates rail transit facilities, the commission or authority may provide and disseminate appropriate educational materials to traffic schools to aid in reducing the number of rail-related traffic accidents, including, but not limited to, a film developed or caused to be developed by the transportation commission or authority on rail transit safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 722, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

369b.

(a) This section shall only apply to counties with a population greater than 500,000.

(b) The court may order any person convicted of a rail transit related traffic violation, as listed in subdivision (c), to attend a traffic school that offers, as a part of its curriculum, a film developed or caused to be developed by a transportation commission or authority on rail transit safety.

(c) For a first offense, a court, at its discretion, may order any person cited for any of the following violations to attend a traffic school offering a rail safety presentation, Internet rail safety test, or rail transit safety film prepared by a county transportation commission or authority, pay an additional fine of one hundred dollars ($100), or both:

(1) Section 369g.

(2) Section 369i.

(3) Subdivision (c) of Section 21752, Section 22450, 22451, or 22452, or subdivision (c) of Section 22526, of the Vehicle Code, involving railroad grade crossings.
